Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2516
Occupational therapist; therapy assistant; licensure required; activities and services not prohibited.

(1) No person may represent himself or herself to be a licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant unless the person is licensed in accordance with the Occupational Therapy Practice Act or has a compact privilege to practice in accordance with the Occupational Therapy Practice Interstate Compact.

(2) Nothing in the Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall be construed to prevent:

(a) Any person licensed in this state pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act from engaging in the profession or occupation for which he or she is licensed;

(b) The activities and services of any person employed as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant who serves in the armed forces of the United States or the United States Public Health Service or who is employed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agencies, if their practice is limited to that service or employment;

(c) The activities and services of any person pursuing an accredited course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational therapy if such activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study and if such a person is designated by a title which clearly indicates his or her status as a student or trainee;

(d) The activities and services of any person fulfilling the supervised fieldwork experience requirements of section 38-2519 if such activities and services constitute a part of the experience necessary to meet the requirements of such section; or

(e) A qualified member of another profession or occupation, including, but not limited to, a recreation specialist or therapist, a special education teacher, an independent living specialist, a work adjustment trainer, a caseworker, or a person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree or certification in such fields, from doing work similar to occupational therapy which is consistent with the member's training if such member does not represent himself or herself by any title or description to be an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 32;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 14;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 122;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6104;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 856;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 12.

Occupational Therapy Practice Interstate Compact, see section 38-4301.